Utah statutes.
36-12-11.   Interim committees' powers.

Interim committees may:

(1)  administer oaths; and

(2)  issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, any other tangible things, and testimony, by following the procedures contained in Title 36, Chapter 14.

